Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-817
Director and employees of the division; investigatory and enforcement powers; application to district court; contempt.

The director and any employee of the division, when authorized by the director or Tax Commissioner, shall have the power (1) to make a thorough investigation into all the records and affairs of any person, organization, or corporation when, in the judgment of the director, such investigation is necessary to the proper performance of the division's duties and the efficient enforcement of the laws, including the power to administer oaths, (2) to examine under oath any person or any officer, employee, or agent of any organization or corporation, (3) to compel by subpoena the production of records, and (4) to compel by subpoena the attendance of any person in this state to testify before the Tax Commissioner or his or her designated representative. If any person willfully refuses to testify or obey a subpoena, the director may apply to a judge of the district court of Lancaster County for an order directing such person to comply with the subpoena. Any person who fails or refuses to obey such a court order shall be guilty of contempt of court.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 17;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 37.